src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# Skolt Saami verb morphology

First a lexicon V_ for still unclassified entries.

## Irregular verbs

Then irregular verbs ij and the copula.

* LEXICON V-NEG_IJ   ij:
The lexicon *V-NEG_IJ*

* +Neg+Ind+Sg1:jiõˈm	   K ; 
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Neg+Ind+Sg1:jim	   K ; 
* +Neg+Ind+Sg2:jiõˈk	   K ; 

* LEXICON IV_LEEQD  leeʹd:l
* LEXICON V0_LEEQD  leeʹd:l
The lexicon *V0_LEEQD* for the copula

## REGULAR VERBS
### CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION

* LEXICON V_1Â_VVCC  põõllâd:põõll
* LEXICON V_POOLLYD  põõllâd:põõll
* LEXICON IV_POOLLYD  põõllâd:põõll
* LEXICON TV_POOLLYD  põõllâd:põõll
* LEXICON V0_POOLLYD  põõllâd:põõll

* poorrâd # examples:*
* *poorrâd:* `poorrâd+V+Inf`
* *pooram:* `poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *poorak:* `poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2`
* *påårr:* `poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3`
* *poorrâp:* `poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1`
* *poorrveʹted:* `poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2`
* *påʹrre:* `poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3`
* *poorât:* `poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4`
* *poʹrrem:* `poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *poʹrriǩ:* `poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2`
* *poori:* `poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3`
* *poorim:* `poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1`
* *poorid:* `poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2`
* *poʹrre:* `poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3`
* *poʹrreš:* `poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4`
* *pooržem:* `poorrâd+V+Pot+Sg1`
* *pooržiǩ:* `poorrâd+V+Pot+Sg2`
* *poorâž:* `poorrâd+V+Pot+Sg3`
* *pooržep:* `poorrâd+V+Pot+Pl1`
* *pooržid:* `poorrâd+V+Pot+Pl2`
* *poorže:* `poorrâd+V+Pot+Pl3`
* *pooržet:* `poorrâd+V+Pot+Sg4`
* *poorže:* `poorrâd+V+Pot+ConNeg`
* *poorčem:* `poorrâd+V+Cond+Sg1`
* *poorčiǩ:* `poorrâd+V+Cond+Sg2`
* *poorči:* `poorrâd+V+Cond+Sg3`
* *poorčim:* `poorrâd+V+Cond+Pl1`
* *poorčid:* `poorrâd+V+Cond+Pl2`
* *poorče:* `poorrâd+V+Cond+Pl3`
* *poorčeš:* `poorrâd+V+Cond+Sg4`
* *poorče:* `poorrâd+V+Cond+ConNeg`
* *poor:* `poorrâd+V+Imprt+Sg2`
* *pååras:* `poorrâd+V+Imprt+Sg3`
* *poorrâp:* `poorrâd+V+Imprt+Pl1`
* *poorrâd:* `poorrâd+V+Imprt+Pl2`
* *pårraz:* `poorrâd+V+Imprt+Pl3`
* *porru:* `poorrâd+V+Imprt+ConNegII`
* *poorrmen:* `poorrâd+V+Actio+Ess`
* *poorrâm:* `poorrâd+V+Actio`
* *poorri:* `poorrâd+V+Act+PrsPrc`
* *poorrâm:* `poorrâd+V+Act+PrfPrc`
* *porrum:* `poorrâd+V+Pass+PrfPrc`
* *poorkani:* `poorrâd+V+VAbess`
* *pooreen:* `poorrâd+V+Ger+Ess`
* *pooreeʹl:* `poorrâd+V+Ger+Instr`
* *porškueʹtted:* `poorrâd+V+Der+Der/InchL+V+Inf`

* LEXICON V_LAUKKOOLLYD  laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll
* LEXICON IV_LAUKKOOLLYD  laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll
* LEXICON TV_LAUKKOOLLYD  laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll
* LEXICON V0_LAUKKOOLLYD  laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll

* : VSUF-INF_ÂD ; 1 laukkõõllâd
* +Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^VOWLower K ;  laukkââll
* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; 3 laukkâʹlle
* :%^VV2V%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ÂD ; 4 laukkõʹlle
* :%^CC2C VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; 5 laukkõõl-
* +Err/Orth-should-be-grade-minus1: VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; 5 ERR laukkõõll-
* +Pot+Sg3:%^CC2C%>âž   K ; 6 laukkõõl-
* +Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%^CC2C%>as K ; 7 laukkââlas 2024-06-11 was laukkõõlas ?Feist
* :%^VV2V VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; 8 laukkõll-
* +Imprt+ConNegII:%^VV2V%>u K ;  laukkõllu
* +Imprt+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%>az K ;  laukkâllaz

* LEXICON V_1Â_VVKK  viikkâd:viikk
* LEXICON IV_1Â_VVKK  viikkâd:viikk
* LEXICON TV_1Â_VVKK  viikkâd:viikk
* : VSUF-INF_ÂD ;  (1)  Inf: viikkâd
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
NomAct in MOsh
* *põõss%>âd*
* *põõss%>âd*

* :%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ;  (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: veekk
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3
* *põõss%^VOWLower*
* *pââss0*

* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%^PALK%>e K ;  (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: veʹǩǩe
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3
* *põõ0ss%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%^PALK%>e*
* *pâ0ʹss000%>e*

* :%^VV2V%^PAL%^PALK VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ÂD ;  (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: viʹǩǩe
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4
* *põõ0ss%^VV2V%^PAL%>e*
* *põ0ʼss00%>e*

* :%^KK2GG VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ;  (5-6)  Pot.Sg3: viiǥǥâž
* +Err/Orth-should-be-grade-minus1: VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ;  (5-6) ERR
+Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus
* *põõss%^KK2GG%>âž*
* *põõzz0%>âž*

* +Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%^KK2GG%>as K ;  (7)  Imprt.Sg3: veeǥǥas
Imprt+Sg3
* *põõss%^VOWLower%^KK2GG%>as*
* *pââzz00%>as*

* :%^VV2V VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ;  (8)  Imprt.ConNegII: vikku
Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc
* *põõss%^VV2V%>u*
* *põ0ss0%>u*

* +Imprt+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%>az K ;  (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: vekkaz
Imprt+Pl3
* *põõss%^VV2V%^VOWLower%>az*
* *pâ0ss00%>az*

* *põõss%^VV2V%^KK2GAllegro»%{ʼØ%}škuätt*
* *põ0z000»0škuätt*

* LEXICON V_1Â_VVSS  koossâd:kooss
* LEXICON IV_1Â_VVSS  koossâd:kooss
* : VSUF-INF_ÂD ;  (1)  Inf: viikkâd
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
NomAct in MOsh
* *põõss%>âd*
* *põõss%>âd*

* :%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ;  (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: veekk
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3
* *põõss%^VOWLower*
* *pââss0*

* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ;  (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: veʹǩǩe
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3
* *põõ0ss%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e*
* *pâ0ʹss000%>e*

* :%^VV2V%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ÂD ;  (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: viʹǩǩe
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4
* *põõ0ss%^VV2V%^PAL%>e*
* *põ0ʼss00%>e*

* :%^KK2GG VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ;  (5-6)  Pot.Sg3: viiǥǥâž
* +Err/Orth-should-be-grade-minus1: VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ;  (5-6) ERR
+Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus
* *põõss%^KK2GG%>âž*
* *põõzz0%>âž*

* +Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%^KK2GG%>as K ;  (7)  Imprt.Sg3: veeǥǥas
Imprt+Sg3
* *põõss%^VOWLower%^KK2GG%>as*
* *pââzz00%>as*

* :%^VV2V VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ;  (8)  Imprt.ConNegII: vikku
Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc
* *põõss%^VV2V%>u*
* *põ0ss0%>u*

* +Imprt+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%>az K ;  (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: vekkaz
Imprt+Pl3
* *põõss%^VV2V%^VOWLower%>az*
* *pâ0ss00%>az*

* *põõss%^VV2V%^KK2GAllegro»%{ʼØ%}škuätt*
* *põ0z000»0škuätt*

* viikkâd # examples:*
* *viikkâd:* `viikkâd+V+Inf`
* *viiǥǥam:* `viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *viiǥǥak:* `viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2`
* *vẹẹkk:* `viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3`
* *viikkâp:* `viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1`
* *viikkveʹted:* `viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2`
* *veʹǩǩe* `:` (Eng. viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3)
* *viiǥǥât:* `viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4`
* *viʹǩǩem* `:` (Eng. viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1)
* *viʹǩǩiǩ* `:` (Eng. viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2)
* *viiǥǥi:* `viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3`
* *viiǥǥim:* `viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1`
* *viiǥǥid:* `viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2`
* *viʹǩǩe:* `viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3`
* *viʹǩǩeš:* `viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4`
* *viiǥǥžem:* `viikkâd+V+Pot+Sg1`
* *viiǥǥžiǩ:* `viikkâd+V+Pot+Sg2`
* *viiǥǥâž:* `viikkâd+V+Pot+Sg3`
* *viiǥǥžep:* `viikkâd+V+Pot+Pl1`
* *viiǥǥžid* `:` (Eng. viikkâd+V+Pot+Pl2)
* *viiǥǥže:* `viikkâd+V+Pot+Pl3`
* *viiǥǥžet:* `viikkâd+V+Pot+Sg4`
* *viiǥǥčem:* `viikkâd+V+Cond+Sg1`
* *viiǥǥčiǩ:* `viikkâd+V+Cond+Sg2`
* *viiǥǥči:* `viikkâd+V+Cond+Sg3`
* *viiǥǥčim:* `viikkâd+V+Cond+Pl1`
* *viiǥǥčid:* `viikkâd+V+Cond+Pl2`
* *viiǥǥče:* `viikkâd+V+Cond+Pl3`
* *viiǥǥčeš:* `viikkâd+V+Cond+Sg4`
* *viiǥǥ:* `viikkâd+V+Imprt+Sg2`
* *vẹẹǥǥas:* `viikkâd+V+Imprt+Sg3`
* *viikkâp:* `viikkâd+V+Imprt+Pl1`
* *viikkâd:* `viikkâd+V+Imprt+Pl2`
* *vẹkkaz:* `viikkâd+V+Imprt+Pl3`
* *viiǥǥ:* `viikkâd+V+Imprt+ConNeg`
* *vikku:* `viikkâd+V+Imprt+ConNegII`
* *viikkmen:* `viikkâd+V+Actio+Ess`
* *viikkâm:* `viikkâd+V+Actio`
* *viikki:* `viikkâd+V+Act+PrsPrc`
* *viikkâm:* `viikkâd+V+Act+PrfPrc`
* *vikkum:* `viikkâd+V+Pass+PrfPrc`
* *viiǥǥkâni:* `viikkâd+V+VAbess`
* *viiǥǥeen:* `viikkâd+V+Ger+Ess`
* *viiǥǥeeʹl:* `viikkâd+V+Ger+Instr`
* *viǥškueʹtted:* `viikkâd+V+Der+Der/InchL+V+Inf`

* LEXICON V_PIYKKLOOCHCHYD  piâkklõõččâd:piâkklõõčč
* LEXICON IV_PIYKKLOOCHCHYD  piâkklõõččâd:piâkklõõčč
* LEXICON V0_PIYKKLOOCHCHYD  piâkklõõččâd:piâkklõõčč
* : VSUF-INF_ÂD ;  (1)  Inf: piâkklõõččâd
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
NomAct in MOsh

* :%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ;  (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: piâkklââčč
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3

* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ;  (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: piâkklâʹčče
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

* :%^VV2V%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ÂD ;  (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: piâkklõʹčče
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

* : VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ;  (5-6)  Pot.Sg3: piâkklõõččâž
+Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus

* +Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%>as K ;  (7)  Imprt.Sg3: piâkklââččas
Imprt+Sg3

* :%^VV2V VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ;  (8)  Imprt.ConNegII: piâkklõčču
Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

* +Imprt+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%>az K ;  (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: piâkklâččaz
Imprt+Pl3

* LEXICON V_1Â_VKK  naggâd:naõ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}gg
* LEXICON IV_1Â_VKK  naggâd:naõ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}gg

* LEXICON V_ROVVYD  rõvvâd:rõ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}vv
* LEXICON IV_ROVVYD  rõvvâd:rõ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}vv
* LEXICON V0_ROVVYD  rõvvâd:rõ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}vv

piâkkâd:piâ%{ʹØ%}kˈk

* LEXICON V_1Â_IY/ECCC  riâddâd:riâdˈd
* LEXICON V0_1Â_IY/ECCC  riâddâd:riâdˈd

* : VSUF-INF_ÂD ;  (1) Inf: piõgˈgâd
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
NomAct in MOsh

* :%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ;  (2) Ind.Prs.Sg3: peâgˈg
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3

* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PALÄ%^PAL%>e K ;  (3) Ind.Prs.Pl3: peäʹǧˈǧe
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

* :%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ÂD ;  (4) Ind.Prt.Pl3: piõʹǧˈǧe
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

* :%^CCC2CC VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ;  (5-6) Ind.Imprt.Sg2: piõgg
Ind.Pot.Sg3: piõggâž
+Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus

* +Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%^CCC2CC%>as K ;  (7) Ind.Imprt.Sg3: peâggas
Imprt+Sg3

* : VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ;  (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: piõgˈgu
Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

* :%^VOWLower K ;  (9) Imprt.Pl3: peâgˈgaz
+Imprt+Pl3

(10) Allegro for incoative: piõg»

* LEXICON V_1Â_VWKKK  piõggâd:piõgˈg
* LEXICON V0_1Â_VWKKK  piõggâd:piõgˈg
* : VSUF-INF_ÂD ;  (1) Inf: piõgˈgâd
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
NomAct in MOsh

* :%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ;  (2) Ind.Prs.Sg3: peâgˈg
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3

* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PALÄ%^PAL%^PALK%>e K ;  (3) Ind.Prs.Pl3: peäʹǧˈǧe
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

* :%^PAL%^PALK VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ÂD ;  (4) Ind.Prt.Pl3: piõʹǧˈǧe
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

* :%^CCC2CC VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ;  (5-6) Ind.Imprt.Sg2: piõgg
Ind.Pot.Sg3: piõggâž
+Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus

* +Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%^CCC2CC%>as K ;  (7) Ind.Imprt.Sg3: peâggas
Imprt+Sg3

* : VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ;  (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: piõgˈgu
Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

* :%^VOWLower K ;  (9) Imprt.Pl3: peâgˈgaz
+Imprt+Pl3

(10) Allegro for incoative: piõg»

* LEXICON V_KHIOCHCHCHYD  ǩiõččâd:ǩiõčˈč
* LEXICON V0_KHIOCHCHCHYD  ǩiõččâd:ǩiõčˈč
* : VSUF-INF_ÂD ;  (1) Inf: ǩiõčˈčâd
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
NomAct in MOsh

* :%^VOWLower%^PALÄ VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ;  (2) Ind.Prs.Sg3: ǩeäčˈč
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3

* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PALÄ%^PAL%>e K ;  (3) Ind.Prs.Pl3: ǩeäʹčˈče
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

* :%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ÂD ;  (4) Ind.Prt.Pl3: ǩiõʹčˈče
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

* :%^CCC2CC VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ;  (5-6) Ind.Imprt.Sg2: ǩiõčč
Ind.Pot.Sg3: ǩiõččâž
+Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus

* +Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%^PALÄ%^CCC2CC%>as K ;  (7) Ind.Imprt.Sg3: ǩeäččas
Imprt+Sg3

* : VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ;  (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: ǩiõčˈču
Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc
